Utah statutes.
13-39-202.   Prohibition of sending certain materials to a registered contact point -- Exception for consent.

(1)  A person may not send, cause to be sent, or conspire with a third party to send a communication to a contact point or domain that has been registered for more than 30 calendar days with the division under Section 13-39-201 if the communication:

(a) has the primary purpose of advertising or promoting a product or service that a minor is prohibited by law from purchasing; or

(b)  contains or has the primary purpose of advertising or promoting material that is harmful to minors, as defined in Section 76-10-1201.

(2) Except as provided in Subsection (4), consent of a minor is not a defense to a violation of this section.

(3)  An Internet service provider does not violate this section for solely transmitting a message across the network of the Internet service provider.

(4) (a)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), a person may send a communication to a contact point if, before sending the communication, the person sending the communication receives consent from an adult who controls the contact point.

(b)  Any person who proposes to send a communication under Subsection (4)(a) shall:

(i)  verify the age of the adult who controls the contact point by inspecting the adult's government-issued identification card in a face-to-face transaction;

(ii)  obtain a written record indicating the adult's consent that is signed by the adult;

(iii)  include in each communication:

(A)  a notice that the adult may rescind the consent; and

(B)  information that allows the adult to opt out of receiving future communications; and

(iv)  notify the division that the person intends to send communications under this Subsection (4).

(c)  The division shall implement rules to verify that a person providing notification under Subsection (4)(b)(iv) complies with this Subsection (4).



Amended by Chapter 336, 2006 General Session

